Wyoming, session 2026, HB0181.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-125 and 9-30-101 through
9-30-107 are created to read:

1-39-125. Liability; biometric data, geolocation data
and automatic license plate reader systems.

A governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from
a violation of W.S. 9-30-101 through 9-30-107.

CHAPTER 30
PROHIBITION ON USING BIOMETRIC DATA, GEOLOCATION DATA AND
AUTOMATIC LICENSE PLATE READER SYSTEMS

9-30-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379
(i) "Automatic license plate reader system"
means a system of one (1) or more mobile or fixed automated
high speed cameras used in combination with computer
algorithms to convert images of license plates into
computer-readable data that is used to identify a motor
vehicle. "Automatic license plate reader system" shall not
include a video system equipped on a school bus under W.S.
21-3-131(b)(x);

(ii) "Biometric data" means data generated by
measurements or analysis of a person's biological, physical
or behavioral characteristics that is used to identify a
person or verify a person's identity. "Biometric data"
includes a fingerprint, palm print, voiceprint, vocal
biomarkers, eye retina or iris scan, hand geometry, facial
geometry or templates, facial recognition outputs, gait
patterns or rhythms or any other biological, physical or
behavioral pattern or characteristic that is used to
identify a specific person. "Biometric data" shall not
include:

(A) A physical or digital photograph or
data derived or generated from a physical or digital
HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379
photograph unless the physical or digital photograph is
subjected to biometric processing or retained for the
purpose of biometric processing at any point for
identification or verification purposes;

(B) A video or audio recording or data
derived or generated from a video or audio recording unless
the video or audio recording is subjected to biometric
processing or retained for the purpose of biometric
processing at any point for identification or verification
purposes;

(C) Information collected, used or stored
for health care treatment, payment or operations under the
federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act;

(D) Information that cannot be used to
identify a person, including anonymized or aggregated
information;

(E) Genetic information, including
deoxyribonucleic acid located in the cells, genetic markers
HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379
or any analysis, profile or data derived from the
deoxyribonucleic acid.

(iii) "Biometric processing" means the
application of an algorithm or automated method to derive
identifiers or templates from a physical or digital
photograph or video or audio recording for the purpose of
identifying a person or verifying a person's identity;

(iv) "Commercial vehicle" means as defined by
W.S. 31-1-101(a)(i);

(v) "Geolocation data" means information derived
from technology, including an automatic license plate
reader system and global positioning system latitude and
longitude coordinates or other mechanisms that directly
identifies the specific location of a person or motor
vehicle within a radius of one thousand seven hundred fifty
(1,750) feet. "Geolocation data" shall not include data
generated by or connected to utility metering
infrastructure systems or equipment for use by a utility;

HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379
(vi) "Governmental entity" means the state and
all its political subdivisions, agencies, instrumentalities
and institutions and any local government entity and its
agencies, instrumentalities and institutions;

(vii) "Law enforcement agency" means a county,
municipal, college or university police force, Wyoming
highway patrol, the division of criminal investigation, the
department of corrections or any state or local agency or
political subdivision or part of an agency or political
subdivision to the extent that the primary purpose of the
agency or political subdivision, or part thereof, is the
prevention or investigation of crime or the enforcement of
penal, traffic or criminal laws. "Law enforcement agency"
shall not include the office of any city, county or
district attorney or other division of the attorney
general;

(viii) "Motor vehicle" means as defined by W.S.
31-1-101(a)(xv);

(ix) "Violent felony" means as defined by W.S.
6-1-104(a)(xii).
HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379

9-30-102. Prohibition of biometric data, geolocation
data and automatic license plate reader systems.

(a) Except as provided by W.S. 9-30-103 and 9-30-104,
no governmental entity shall:

(i) Obtain, retain, possess, access, request or
use:

(A) Biometric data to identify a person or
verify a person's identity;

(B) Geolocation data to identify the
specific location of a person or motor vehicle; or

(C) An automatic license plate reader
system to identify a motor vehicle.

(ii) Install or equip an automatic license plate
reader system on public buildings or on public roads and
highways in this state;

HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379
(iii) Use an automatic license plate reader
system to collect tolls, road usage charges, congestion
fees or any similar charges or fees imposed on public roads
or highways in this state; or

(iv) Enter into an agreement with a third party
vendor to perform any of the activities listed in
paragraphs (i) through (iii) of this subsection.

(b) No governmental entity shall:

(i) Purchase or subscribe to biometric data,
geolocation data or data derived from an automatic license
plate reader system from a third party if the governmental
entity would be prohibited from collecting the data
directly under this chapter or would be required to obtain
a warrant to collect the data;

(ii) Share biometric data, geolocation data or
data derived from an automatic license plate reader system
to any person outside the governmental entity's
jurisdiction, except pursuant to a warrant;

HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379
(iii) Sell or convey biometric data, geolocation
data or data derived from an automatic license plate reader
system to a private, nongovernmental third party for any
reason.

9-30-103. Use of biometric data and geolocation data
by law enforcement agencies.

(a) A law enforcement agency shall only obtain,
retain, possess, access, request or use biometric data or
geolocation data for one (1) or more of the following
purposes:

(i) Investigating a violent felony when there is
probable cause to believe that an unidentified person has
committed, is a victim of or is a witness to a violent
felony;

(ii) Assisting in the location or identification
of a missing or endangered person; or

(iii) Assisting in the identification of a
person who is deceased or believed to be deceased.
HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379

(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this
section, a law enforcement agency shall obtain a warrant
prior to obtaining biometric data or geolocation data for
purposes authorized under subsection (a) of this section.

(c) A law enforcement agency may obtain biometric
data or geolocation data prior to the issuance of a warrant
if access to the biometric data or geolocation data will
reduce or mitigate an emergency that poses an imminent
threat of serious physical harm to a person.

(d) No law enforcement agency shall use the results
of a search using biometric data or geolocation data as the
sole basis to establish probable cause in a criminal
investigation. The results of a search using biometric data
or geolocation data shall be used in conjunction with other
information and evidence lawfully obtained by the law
enforcement agency to establish probable cause in a
criminal investigation.

9-30-104. Use of automatic license plate reader
systems.
HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379

(a) A law enforcement agency shall only use an
automatic license plate reader system for the purpose of
identifying a motor vehicle that is:

(i) Reported stolen by the motor vehicle's
registered owner;

(ii) Associated with a wanted, deceased, missing
or endangered person;

(iii) Registered to a person that has an
outstanding arrest warrant;

(iv) Involved in a case-specific criminal
investigative surveillance;

(v) Involved in a violent felony; or

(vi) In the vicinity of a recent crime and may
be connected to that crime.

HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this
section, a law enforcement agency shall obtain a warrant
prior to using an automatic license plate reader system for
purposes authorized under subsection (a) of this section.

(c) A law enforcement agency may use an automatic
license plate reader system prior to the issuance of a
warrant if paragraph (a)(i) of this section applies or if
using the automatic license plate reader system will reduce
or mitigate an emergency that poses an imminent threat of
serious physical harm to a person.

(d) The department of transportation and a law
enforcement agency shall only install and use an automatic
license plate reader system for the purpose of identifying
a motor vehicle:

(i) At ports of entry;

(ii) At weigh stations, including weigh station
ramps;

HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379
(iii) For violations of commercial vehicle
requirements under title 31 of the Wyoming statutes.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
governmental entity shall only use an automatic license
plate reader system for the sole purpose of identifying a
motor vehicle to regulate the use of parking facilities to
enforce parking restrictions and to control access to
secured areas.

9-30-105. Policies relating to biometric data,
geolocation data and automatic license plate reader
systems.

(a) Each governmental entity that obtains, retains,
possesses, accesses, requests or uses biometric data,
geolocation data or data derived from an automatic license
plate reader system as authorized under this chapter shall
adopt and maintain a written policy regarding the use of
biometric data, geolocation data or an automatic license
plate reader system.

HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379
(b) The written policy adopted and maintained by a
governmental entity under subsection (a) of this section
shall, at a minimum, include:

(i) A statement regarding the specific purposes
for which biometric data, geolocation data or an automatic
license plate reader system may be used in accordance with
all applicable federal and state laws, including this
chapter;

(ii) A maximum retention period of not more than
seven (7) days for biometric data, geolocation data and
data derived from an automatic license plate reader system
that is not associated with an active investigation or
enforcement action and procedures for timely deletion of
that data;

(iii) Access control measures, including
role-based permissions, logging of all access and monthly
audits;

HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379
(iv) Restrictions on disclosure or sharing of
biometric data, geolocation data and data derived from an
automatic license plate reader system;

(v) Security requirements for storage of
biometric data, geolocation data and data derived from an
automatic license plate reader system, including encryption
and breach notification procedures;

(vi) The governmental entity's obligations,
including compliance with applicable federal and state law,
breach notification timelines and certification of data
destruction;

(vii) Mandatory training for all persons
involved in obtaining, retaining, possessing, accessing,
requesting or using biometric data, geolocation data or
data derived from an automatic license plate reader system.
The mandatory training under this paragraph shall not be
created or administered by a private entity whose business
involves collecting biometric data, geolocation data or
data derived from an automatic license plate reader system.

HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379
9-30-106. Civil cause of action.

A person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter may bring
a civil cause of action against a governmental entity for
damages, injunctive relief or both in a court of competent
jurisdiction.

9-30-107. Evidentiary prohibition.

No biometric data, geolocation data or data derived from an
automatic license plate reader system that is accessed in
violation of this chapter shall be admissible as evidence
in any civil or criminal proceeding, except to prove a
violation of this chapter in accordance with W.S. 9-30-106.

Section 2. W.S. 1-39-104(a) is amended to read:

1-39-104. Granting immunity from tort liability;
liability on contracts; exceptions.

(a) A governmental entity and its public employees
while acting within the scope of duties are granted
immunity from liability for any tort except as provided by
HB0181

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0379
W.S. 1-39-105 through 1-39-112 and 1-39-122 through
1-39-124 1-39-125. Any immunity in actions based on a
contract entered into by a governmental entity is waived
except to the extent provided by the contract if the
contract was within the powers granted to the entity and
was properly executed and except as provided in W.S.
1-39-120(b). The claims procedures of W.S. 1-39-113 apply
to contractual claims against governmental entities.

Section 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
modify or impair existing contracts or obligations
regarding biometric data, geolocation data or an automatic
license plate reader system executed before July 1, 2026.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0181